Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.213] RIGHT TO HOUSE YOUTH. new text end new text begin (a) Residential tenants have the right to house a youth 25 years of age and younger for up to 60 days, provided the tenant has fulfilled the requirements of paragraph (b). A landlord may not begin an eviction on the basis of the youth staying in the unit or retaliate against a tenant who provides notice consistent with paragraph (b). A landlord must not raise the rent or utility fees for the first 60 days the youth is residing in the unit. The landlord must not require the youth to sign a lease or rental agreement for the first 60 days the youth is residing in the unit. new text end new text begin (b) A residential tenant who is housing a youth 25 years of age or younger shall provide the landlord with notice that the youth is staying with them within seven days of the youth's arrival, through mail, telephone, or email communication using the contact information they normally use for their landlord. The notice must indicate the name and address of the tenant, the name and age of the youth if the youth is under 18 years of age, or the full name and date of birth of the youth, if the youth is 18 years of age or older. new text end new text begin (c) The residential tenant is responsible for all existing liabilities related to the damage to the rental unit, rent payments, and other responsibilities as a tenant. new text end new text begin (d) An eviction action or other retaliation case filed against a tenant in violation of this section shall be dismissed and the record shall be expunged. A landlord is liable for any damages to the tenant for violating this section, and for the cost of court fees and attorney fees in enforcing this section. new text end